New Jersey, session 221, A3864.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Commissioner of Education shall establish and maintain an educator common application and web portal, which shall be fully operational within 90 days of the effective date of P.L.   , c.    (C.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  The web portal shall allow an educator to submit a single common application to apply for employment at the public schools of the State. b.    The common application and web portal established under subsection a. of this section shall: (1) maximize the ability of educators to connect with public schools that have employment openings; (2) increase the degree of information sharing regarding employment opportunities for educators; and (3) maintain high standards for data privacy and security. c.     The commissioner may contract with a private vendor to effectuate the purposes of this section. d.    Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a school district or public school employer from using its own application process or web portal or from requiring additional materials from applicants who apply for employment using the common application and web portal established pursuant to this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.